src/fst/morphology/affixes/quantifiers.lexc
!! Quantifier inflection
!  ---------------
!! Livvi Karelian quantifiers inflect for case.

!LEXICON NUM_
!+TYÄ: # ;

LEXICON NUM-STEMS
@U.NUM-YKSI.YES@yksi:@U.NUM-YKSI.YES@#y%{front%} NUM_YKSI ;
kaksi:#ka%{back%} NUM_KAKSI ;
kolme:#kolm%{back%} NUM_KOLME ;
nelli:#nell%{front%} NUM_NELLI ;
viizi:#viid%{front%} NUM_VIIZI ;
kuuzi:#kuud%{back%} NUM_KUUZI ;
seiččie:#seičče%{front%} NUM_SEIČČIE ;
kaheksa:#kaheks%{back%} NUM_KAHEKSA ;
yheksä:#yheks%{front%} NUM_YHEKSÄ ;

LEXICON NUM_OZA
+Num+Card:%{back%} NMN_OZA/SÄYNÄ ;
@U.NUM-CARD.WAS@:@U.NUM-CARD.WAS@%{back%} ORD_01_BACK ;

LEXICON NUM_MUARJU  !!≈ **@CODE@** muarju:muarja
+Num+Card:%{back%} NMN_MUARJU/PIÄSTÄNDY ;
@U.NUM-CARD.WAS@:@U.NUM-CARD.WAS@%{back%} ORD_01_BACK ;

!LEXICON NUM_SÄYNÄ
!+Card:%{front%} NMN_OZA/SÄYNÄ ;

LEXICON NUM_MILJON
:%{back%} NUM_MILJON_01 ;
LEXICON NUM_MILJON_01
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@ NUM-NOM ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@u%>a NUM-SG-PAR_Zero ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@a NUM-SG-GEN ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@a NUM-USUALLY-WEAK ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@a NUM-USUALLY-STRONG ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@oi NUM-NOM ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@oi NUM-PL-GEN_N ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@oi NUM-PL-PAR_Zero ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@oi NUM-INS ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@oi NUM-USUALLY-WEAK ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@oi NUM-USUALLY-STRONG ;

LEXICON NUM_MILJON_COMPOUND
:%{back%} NUM_MILJON_01_COMPOUND ;
LEXICON NUM_MILJON_01_COMPOUND
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@u%>a NUM-NOM ; ! compound nom = miljonua
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@u%>a NUM-SG-PAR_Zero ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@a NUM-SG-GEN ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@a NUM-USUALLY-WEAK ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@a NUM-USUALLY-STRONG ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@oi NUM-NOM ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@oi NUM-PL-GEN_N ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@oi NUM-PL-PAR_Zero ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@oi NUM-INS ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@oi NUM-USUALLY-WEAK ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@oi NUM-USUALLY-STRONG ;

LEXICON NUM_MILJARDU
:%{back%} NUM_MILJARDU_01 ;
LEXICON NUM_MILJARDU_01
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@%^A2UÄ2Y NUM-NOM ; ! miljarda → miljardu
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@%>%{aäoeöuiy%} NUM-SG-PAR_Zero ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@ NUM-SG-GEN ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@ NUM-USUALLY-WEAK ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@ NUM-USUALLY-STRONG ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@%^A2O%>i NUM-NOM ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@%^A2O%>i NUM-PL-GEN_N ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@%^A2O%>i NUM-PL-PAR_Zero ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@%^A2O%>i NUM-INS ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@%^A2O%>i NUM-USUALLY-WEAK ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@%^A2O%>i NUM-USUALLY-STRONG ;

LEXICON NUM_MILJARDU_COMPOUND
:%{back%} NUM_MILJARDU_01_COMPOUND ;
LEXICON NUM_MILJARDU_01_COMPOUND
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@%>%{aäoeöuiy%} NUM-NOM ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@%>%{aäoeöuiy%} NUM-SG-PAR_Zero ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@ NUM-SG-GEN ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@ NUM-USUALLY-WEAK ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@ NUM-USUALLY-STRONG ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@%^A2O%>i NUM-NOM ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@%^A2O%>i NUM-PL-GEN_N ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@%^A2O%>i NUM-PL-PAR_Zero ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@%^A2O%>i NUM-INS ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@%^A2O%>i NUM-USUALLY-WEAK ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@%^A2O%>i NUM-USUALLY-STRONG ;

!LEXICON NUM_MILJOUNU  !!≈ **@CODE@** muarju:muarja
!@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@%^A2UÄ2Y NUM-NOM ;
! SG-ACC/APR/COM/GENSUF-USUALLY-WEAK ;
! SGPARSUF_A2 ;
!+Sg: OBLIQUE-CASES-NOT-GENITIVE-DERIVATIVES ;
! PLNOMSUF-USUALLY-WEAK ;
!:%^A2O%>i PL-GEN/COM/APRSUF_N ; 
!:%^A2O%>i PLPARSUF_Zero ;
!:%^A2O%>i PLINSSUF ;
!+Pl:%^A2O%>i OBLIQUE-CASES-NOT-GENITIVE-DERIVATIVES ;


LEXICON NUM_SADA
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@ NUM-NOM ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@%>%{aäoeöuiy%} NUM-SG-PAR_Zero ; 
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@%{back%}%^WGStem00 NUM-USUALLY-WEAK ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@%{back%}00 NUM-USUALLY-STRONG ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@%{back%}%^WGStem0 NUM-USUALLY-WEAK ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@%{back%}00 NUM-USUALLY-STRONG ;

LEXICON NUM_SADA_COMPOUND
: NUM_SADA_01_COMPOUND ;
LEXICON NUM_SADA_01_COMPOUND
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@%>%{aäoeöuiy%} NUM-NOM ; ! compound nom = sadua
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@%>%{aäoeöuiy%} NUM-SG-PAR_Zero ; 
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@%{back%}%^WGStem00 NUM-USUALLY-WEAK ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@%{back%}00 NUM-USUALLY-STRONG ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@%{back%}%^WGStem0 NUM-USUALLY-WEAK ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@%{back%}00 NUM-USUALLY-STRONG ;

LEXICON NUM_TUHAT_COMPOUND
: NUM_TUHAT_01_COMPOUND ;
LEXICON NUM_TUHAT_01_COMPOUND
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@t%>tu NUM-NOM ; ! compound nom = tuhattu
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@t00 NUM-SG-PAR_tu ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@nde NUM-USUALLY-WEAK ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@nde NUM-USUALLY-STRONG ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@ndet NUM-NOM ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@nzi NUM-PL-GEN_EN ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@nzii NUM-PL-PAR_Zero ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@nzi NUM-INS ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@nzi NUM-USUALLY-WEAK ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@nzi NUM-USUALLY-STRONG ;
